Washington statutes.
RCW 18.310.160

Appraisal management company account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5294-S.SL) ***

The appraisal management company account is created in the state treasury. All fees and penalties under this chapter must be paid to the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2010 c 179 s 16.]